lib/_hunspell/tests/affixes.aff
# SPDX-License-Identifier: BSD-3-Clause
# SPDX-FileCopyrightText: 2019 M. Shulhan <ms@kilabit.info>
# simple example for affix compression (see Hunspell(4))
PFX A Y 1
PFX A 0 re .

SFX B Y 2
SFX B 0 ed [^y]
SFX B y ied y
